Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6802
Genetic sequencer; operational and research software for genetic sequencing; use prohibited; conditions.

No medical facility or research facility shall use any genetic sequencer or operational and research software for genetic sequencing if such genetic sequencer or operational and research software is produced in or by any:

(1) Foreign adversary;

(2) State-owned enterprise of any foreign adversary;

(3) Business domiciled in any foreign adversary; or

(4) Subsidiary or affiliate of a business domiciled in any foreign adversary.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 33.